North Carolina, session 2025, SB249.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 163-201(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) For purposes of nominating and electing members of the House of Representatives of
the Congress of the United States, the State of North Carolina shall be divided into 14 districts
as follows:
District 1: Bertie County, Camden County, Chowan County, Currituck County,
Edgecombe County, Gates County, Granville County: VTD ANTI, VTD
CRDL, VTD EAOX, VTD SALM: Block(s) 0779702001005,
0779702001006, 0779702001007, 0779702001008, 0779702001011,
0779702001012, 0779702001013, 0779702001014, 0779702001015,
0779702001016, 0779702001020, 0779702001021, 0779702001023,
0779702001024, 0779702001025, 0779702001026, 0779702001027,
0779702001028, 0779702001029, 0779702001030, 0779702001031,
0779702001032, 0779702001035, 0779702001036, 0779702001037,
0779702001038, 0779702001039, 0779702001040, 0779702001041,
0779702001042, 0779702001043, 0779702001044, 0779702001045,
0779702001046, 0779702001047, 0779702001048, 0779702001049,
0779702001050, 0779702001051, 0779702001052, 0779702001053,
0779702001054, 0779702001055, 0779702001056, 0779702001057,
0779702001058, 0779702001059, 0779702001060, 0779702001061,
0779702001062, 0779702001063, 0779702001064, 0779702001068,
0779702001069, 0779702001070, 0779702001071, 0779702001072,
0779702001073, 0779702002002, 0779702002004, 0779702002005,
0779702002007, 0779702002025, 0779704001000, 0779704001001,
0779705001000, 0779705001001, 0779705001002, 0779705001003,
0779705001004, 0779705001009; VTD SOOX; Greene County, Halifax
County, Hertford County, Lenoir County, Martin County, Nash County,
Northampton County, Pasquotank County, Perquimans County, Tyrrell
County, Vance County, Warren County, Washington County, Wayne County,
Wilson County.Beaufort County, Bertie County, Camden County, Carteret
County, Chowan County, Craven County, Currituck County, Dare County,
Edgecombe County, Gates County, Granville County: VTD ANTI, VTD
CRDL, VTD EAOX, VTD SALM: Block(s) 0779702001005,
0779702001006, 0779702001007, 0779702001008, 0779702001011,
0779702001012, 0779702001013, 0779702001014, 0779702001015,
0779702001016, 0779702001020, 0779702001021, 0779702001023,
0779702001024, 0779702001025, 0779702001026, 0779702001027,
0779702001028, 0779702001029, 0779702001030, 0779702001031,
0779702001032, 0779702001035, 0779702001036, 0779702001037,
*S249-v-4*

0779702001038, 0779702001039, 0779702001040, 0779702001041,
0779702001042, 0779702001043, 0779702001044, 0779702001045,
0779702001046, 0779702001047, 0779702001048, 0779702001049,
0779702001050, 0779702001051, 0779702001052, 0779702001053,
0779702001054, 0779702001055, 0779702001056, 0779702001057,
0779702001058, 0779702001059, 0779702001060, 0779702001061,
0779702001062, 0779702001063, 0779702001064, 0779702001068,
0779702001069, 0779702001070, 0779702001071, 0779702001072,
0779702001073, 0779702002002, 0779702002004, 0779702002005,
0779702002007, 0779702002025, 0779704001000, 0779704001001,
0779705001000, 0779705001001, 0779705001002, 0779705001003,
0779705001004, 0779705001009; VTD SOOX; Halifax County, Hertford
County, Hyde County, Martin County, Nash County, Northampton County,
Onslow County: VTD SW19: Block(s) 1330001051000, 1330001051001,
1330001051002, 1330001051003, 1330001051004, 1330001051005,
1330001051006, 1330001051007, 1330001051008, 1330001051009,
1330001051010, 1330001051011, 1330001051012, 1330001051013,
1330001051014, 1330001051015, 1330001051016, 1330001051018,
1330001051020, 1330001051021, 1330001051022, 1330001051023,
1330001051024, 1330001051025, 1330001051026, 1330001051027,
1330001051028, 1330001051029, 1330001051030, 1330001051031,
1330001051032, 1330001051033, 1330001051034, 1330001051035,
1330001051036, 1330001051037, 1330001051038, 1330001051039,
1330001051040, 1330001051041, 1330001051042, 1330001051043,
1330001051044, 1330001051045, 1330001051046, 1330001051047,
1330001051048, 1330001051049, 1330001051050, 1330001051051,
1330001051052, 1330001051053, 1330001051054, 1330001051055,
1330001051056, 1330001051057, 1330001051058, 1330001051059,
1330001051060, 1330001051061, 1330001051062, 1330001051063,
1330001051064, 1330001051065, 1330001051066, 1330001051067,
1330001052000, 1330001052001, 1330001052002, 1330001052003,
1330001052004, 1330001052005, 1330001052006, 1330001052007,
1330001052008, 1330001052009, 1330001052010, 1330001052011,
1330001052012, 1330001052013, 1330001052014, 1330001052015,
1330001052016, 1330001052017, 1330001052018, 1330001052019,
1330001052020, 1330001052021, 1330001052022, 1330001052023,
1330001052024, 1330001052025, 1330001052026, 1330001052027,
1330001052028, 1330001052029, 1330001052030, 1330001052031,
1330001052032, 1330001052033, 1330001052034, 1330001052035,
1330001052036, 1330001052037, 1330001052038, 1330001052039,
1330001052041, 1330001052042, 1330001052043, 1330001052044,
1330001052047, 1330001052048, 1330001052049, 1330001052050,
1330001052051, 1330001052052, 1330001052053, 1330001052054,
1330001052055, 1330001052056, 1330001052057, 1330001052058,
1330001052059, 1330001052060, 1330001052061, 1330001052062,
1330001053018, 1330001053020, 1330001053040, 1330001053041,
1330001053042; Pamlico County, Pasquotank County, Perquimans County,
Tyrrell County, Vance County, Warren County, Washington County.
…
District 3: Beaufort County, Carteret County, Craven County, Dare County, Duplin
County, Hyde County, Jones County, Onslow County, Pamlico County, Pitt
Page 2 Session Law 2025-95 Senate Bill 249

County, Sampson County: VTD CLCE, VTD CLEA, VTD CLNE, VTD
CLSW, VTD CLWE, VTD GARL, VTD GIDD, VTD HARR, VTD INGO,
VTD KEEN, VTD KFRK, VTD LAKE, VTD NGRV, VTD PLVW: Block(s)
1639702021031, 1639702021032, 1639702021033, 1639703042023,
1639703042024; VTD ROSE, VTD ROWA, VTD SBRG, VTD TURK, VTD
WBRK.Duplin County, Greene County, Jones County, Lenoir County,
Onslow County: VTD BC21, VTD BM08, VTD CL10, VTD CR07, VTD
EN03, VTD FS16, VTD GB12, VTD HM05, VTD HN14, VTD HR17, VTD
HU20, VTD JA01, VTD ML23, VTD MT24, VTD NE22A, VTD NE22B,
VTD NM13, VTD NR02, VTD RL09, VTD SF18, VTD SW19: Block(s)
1330001041015, 1330001041016, 1330001041017, 1330001041018,
1330001041023, 1330001041025, 1330001041028, 1330001041038,
1330001041039, 1330001041040, 1330001041041, 1330001041042,
1330001041045, 1330001041046, 1330001041047, 1330001041048,
1330001051017, 1330001051019, 1330001052040, 1330001052045,
1330001052046, 1330001053000, 1330001053001, 1330001053002,
1330001053003, 1330001053004, 1330001053005, 1330001053006,
1330001053011, 1330001053012, 1330001053013, 1330001053014,
1330001053015, 1330001053016, 1330001053017, 1330001053019,
1330001053021, 1330001053022, 1330001053023, 1330001053024,
1330001053025, 1330001053026, 1330001053027, 1330001053028,
1330001053029, 1330001053030, 1330001053031, 1330001053032,
1330001053033, 1330001053034, 1330001053035, 1330001053036,
1330001053037, 1330001053038, 1330001053039, 1330005001119,
1330005001124, 1330005001181, 1330028011016, 1330028011017,
1330028011018, 1330028011019, 1330028011020, 1330028011021,
1330028011022, 1330028011023, 1330028011024, 1330028011025,
1330028011026, 1330028011027, 1330028011028, 1330028011031,
1339901000001, 1339901000002, 1339901000003, 1339901000004,
1339901000005; VTD TL06, VTD VR15, VTD WN04; Pitt County,
Sampson County: VTD CLCE, VTD CLEA, VTD CLNE, VTD CLSW, VTD
CLWE, VTD GARL, VTD GIDD, VTD HARR, VTD INGO, VTD KEEN,
VTD KFRK, VTD LAKE, VTD NGRV, VTD PLVW: Block(s)
1639702021031, 1639702021032, 1639702021033, 1639703042023,
1639703042024; VTD ROSE, VTD ROWA, VTD SBRG, VTD TURK, VTD
WBRK; Wayne County, Wilson County.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 22nd day of October,
2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Senate Bill 249 Session Law 2025-95 Page 3